pt-PT: Padrão de malha de rede: Losango; Hexagonal; Quadrado; Outro
fr: Motif des mailles du filet: Losange; Hexagonal; Carré; Autre
hr-HR: Uzorak mreže: Romb; Šesterokutno; Kvadratno; Ostalo
pt-BR: Rede padrão da malha: Diamante; Hexagonal; Quadrado; Outro
it: Trama delle maglie della rete: A rombi; Esagonale; Quadrato; Altro
sk-SK: Vzor sieťoviny: Kosoštvorec; Šesťuholník; Štvorec; Iné
ko: 그물망 패턴: 다이아몬드; 육각형; 정사각형; 기타
nb: Nettmaskemønster: Diamant; Heksagonal; Firkantet; Annet
nl: Net maaspatroon: Ruitvormig; Zeshoekig; Vierkant; Anders
hu: Háló mintája: Rombusz; Hatszögletű; Négyzetes; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vzorec mrežnih očes: Rombasta; Šestkotna; Kvadratna; Drugo
fi: Verkon kuviointi: Timantti; Kuusikulmainen; Neliö; Muu
pl: Wzór oczek siatki: Romboidalny; Sześciokątny; Kwadratowy; Inne
zh-CN: 网眼图案: 菱形; 六边形; 方形; 其他
ro-RO: Tiparul ochiurilor plasei: Romb; Hexagonal; Pătrat; Altele
da: Maskemønster i net: Rombe; Sekskantet; Firkantet; Andet
th: รูปแบบตาข่าย: รูปเพชร; หกเหลี่ยม; สี่เหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 網目圖案: 菱形; 六邊形; 方形; 其他
ru: Форма ячеек сетки: Ромб; Шестиугольник; Квадрат; Другое
ja: ネットメッシュパターン: ダイヤモンド; 六角形; 四角形; その他
es: Patrón de malla de red: Diamante; Hexagonal; Cuadrado; Otro
bg-BG: Шарка на мрежата: Ромб; Шестоъгълник; Квадрат; Друго
en: Net mesh pattern: Diamond; Hexagonal; Square; Other
de: Netzmaschenmuster: Rautenförmig; Sechseckig; Quadratisch; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Tinklo akių raštas: Rombas; Šešiakampis; Kvadratinis; Kita
vi: Mẫu lưới: Hình thoi; Hình lục giác; Hình vuông; Khác
sv: Nätmaskmönster: Diamant; Sexkantig; Fyrkantig; Övrigt
el: Μοτίβο πλέγματος δικτύου: Ρόμβος; Εξάγωνο; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
tr: Ağ örgüsü deseni: Elmas; Altıgen; Kare; Diğer
cs: Vzor sítě: Kosočtvercový; Šestihranný; Čtvercový; Ostatní